North Carolina, session 2025, SB732.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the recurring sum of $200,000 for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
to conduct bi-annual analyses of Economic Progress in North Carolina. The Department shall
report the results of the analyses to the General Assembly no later than January 31 of every
odd-numbered year, and each report shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Utilize publicly available data and interview people of various
socio-economic backgrounds.
(2) Measure, for the State and each county, at least the following metrics:
a. Hardship, as measured by the poverty rate, child poverty, deep
poverty, inequality, and the supplemental poverty rate.
*S732-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Share of jobs that (i) pay below a living income wage and (ii) provide
basic needs and quality conditions and benefits.
c. Share of a household's monthly income that goes to food, housing,
health care, and childcare.
d. Percent of people who are considered cost burdened based on the
amount of income spent on housing, childcare, and health care
premiums.
e. Cost of post-secondary education and job training relative to income.
f. Persistent poverty census tracts and concentrated poverty census
tracts, including the number of people living in persistent and
concentrated poverty neighborhoods.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 732-First Edition